District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

16-2922

Widow or widower of tenant in common.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 597, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 803(c)(3), 48 DCR 2087

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-2922.
1973 Ed., § 16-2922.